Maine, session 132, LD945.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5157, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 664, §3, is amended
to read:
1. Eligible properties. The redevelopment authority may acquire property through
an agreement under section 5158, subsection 4, which may include The following are
eligible properties for the purposes of this chapter:
A. Property that the redevelopment authority has determined is abandoned as
demonstrated by a totality of evidence including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) Doors and windows on the property are boarded up, broken or continuously
left unlocked;
(2) Rubbish, trash or debris has accumulated on the property;
(3) Furnishings and personal property are absent from the property;
(4) The buildings or improvements on the property are deteriorating so as to
constitute a threat to public health or safety;
(5) Gas, electric or water service to the property has been terminated or utility
consumption is so low that it indicates the property is not regularly occupied;
(6) A mortgagee has changed the locks on the property and neither the mortgagor
nor anyone on the mortgagor's behalf has requested entrance to, or taken other steps
to gain entrance to, the property;
(7) Reports of trespass, vandalism or other illegal acts being committed on the
property have been made to local law enforcement authorities;
(8) A code enforcement officer or other public official has made a determination
or finding that the property is abandoned or unfit for occupancy;
(9) The mortgagor is deceased and there is no evidence that an heir or personal
representative has taken possession of the property; or
Page 1 - 132LR1648(03)

(10) Other reasonable signs of abandonment;
B. Property that the redevelopment authority has determined is blighted because of:
(1) Dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence;
(2) Inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation or open spaces;
(3) High density of population and overcrowding;
(4) Tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land;
(5) The existence of conditions that endanger life or property; or
(6) Any combination of the factors described in subparagraphs (1) to (5);
C. Property that the redevelopment authority has determined is functionally obsolete
due to a substantial loss in value resulting from factors such as overcapacity, changes
in technology, deficiencies or superadequacies in design or other similar factors that
affect the property itself or the property's relationship with other surrounding property;
D. Property that is environmentally hazardous; and
E. Property that a municipality or county has determined is not within the capacity of
the municipality or county to redevelop and for which the municipality or county has
requested the assistance of the redevelopment authority.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §5158, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. General corporate powers. To exercise all general powers of a corporation
under Title 13-C, section 302;
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §5158, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 664, §3, is amended
to read:
4. Agreements with public entities. To enter into agreements with public entities,
including, but not limited to, municipalities, counties, regional planning organizations, state
agencies and municipal or regionally organized land banks in order to effectuate the
purposes of this chapter. Agreements may include the acquisition of property or rights in
property from a municipality or county whose governing unit declares the need for such an
agreement;
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §5158, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 664, §3, is amended
to read:
5. Agreements with federal agencies. To enter into agreements with federal agencies
related to funding of the redevelopment of property acquired in accordance with to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter;
Sec. 5. 30-A MRSA §5158, sub-§5-A is enacted to read:
5-A. Agreements with private parties. To enter into agreements with a private entity
or person to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. If an agreement under this subsection
is for the acquisition of property, the municipality in which the property is located or, if the
property is located in an unorganized or deorganized township of the State, the Maine Land
Use Planning Commission must consent to the acquisition;
Sec. 6. 30-A MRSA §5158, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 664, §3, is amended
to read:
Page 2 - 132LR1648(03)

6. Assistance. To provide assistance, by request, to entities in the State engaged in
redevelopment activities by using the best practices adopted by the Development Ready
Advisory Committee under section 5161;
Page 3 - 132LR1648(03)